Louisiana, session 2026, HB518.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:1952(13) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1952. Courts created by special legislative Act
The following city courts, heretofore created and established by special
legislative Act, are hereby recognized and continued in existence and, except as
otherwise provided in this Section, their territorial jurisdiction shall extend through
the city and ward or wards wherein the city in which they are domiciled is located,
as extended from time to time:
* * *
(13)(a) The City Court of Lake Charles, domiciled in the city of Lake
Charles, parish of Calcasieu, having two city judges and a city marshal;.
(b) For the purpose of electing judges, the court shall be divided into two
election sections.
(i) Election section one is composed of Precincts 300, 301, 302, 303, 304,
305, 307, 308, 309E, 309W, 310, 311, 312, 313E, 313W, 315E, 316E, 317, 318,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-438 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 518
319N, 319S, 320E, 320W, 321, 322, 323, 324, 327, 328, 329, 330, 332N, 360 (Part -
that portion within Ward 3), 361, 364, and 371N of Calcasieu Parish.
(ii) Election section two is composed of Precincts 306, 314, 315W, 316W,
325, 326, 331, 332S, 333, 334, 335, 336, 337, 338, 339, 340, 362, 363, 365, 366,
367, 368, 369, 370, 371S, and 372 of Calcasieu Parish.
(c) The judgeship designated as Division B shall be elected from election
section one, and the judgeship designated as Division A shall be elected from
election section two.
* * *
Section 2.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (01-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those filed have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana House of Representatives and the Louisiana
Senate to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the Legislature
of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 18:532 and
532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-438 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 518
Section 3. Any election to elect a judge to the City Court of Lake Charles occurring
after the effective date of this Act shall be conducted within the appropriate election section
established by the provisions of Section 1 of this Act.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.